Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.084

Pledge by electors.

Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of a political party shall execute the following pledge: "If selected for the position of elector, I agree to serve and to mark my ballots for president and vice president for the nominees for those offices of the party that nominated me." Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of an unaffiliated presidential candidate shall execute the following pledge: "If selected for the position of elector as a nominee of an unaffiliated presidential candidate, I agree to serve and to mark my ballots for that candidate and for that candidate's vice presidential running mate." The executed pledges must accompany the submission of the corresponding names to the secretary of state.

[ 2019 c 143 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.